Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-1008.01
Equalization aid; amount.

Each local system shall receive equalization aid in the amount that the total formula need, as determined pursuant to section 79-1007.11, exceeds its total formula resources, as determined pursuant to section 79-1017.01. The equalization aid for a local system shall be zero if the total formula resources equals or exceeds the total formula need for such local system.

Laws 1997, LB 710, § 11;

Laws 1997, LB 806, § 38;

Laws 1998, LB 989, § 7;

Laws 1998, Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 19;

Laws 1999, LB 149, § 6;

Laws 2001, LB 797, § 20;

Laws 2002, LB 898, § 8;

Laws 2003, LB 540, § 4;

Laws 2004, LB 1093, § 5;

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 84;

Laws 2008, LB988, § 33;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB5, § 10;

Laws 2011, LB8, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB18, § 5;

Laws 2011, LB235, § 12;

Laws 2016, LB959, § 5;

Laws 2019, LB675, § 9.